Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Article 17. Caller ID Anti-spoofing Act.

§ 77-3-801.
Short title.

This article may be cited as the “Caller ID Anti-Spoofing Act.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 326, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

Cross References—

A violation of the Mississippi Telephone Solicitation Act ( §77-3-701 et seq.) is a violation of this article, see
§77-3-707.

§ 77-3-803.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Automatic number identification” means a system that identifies the billing account for a call and includes an enhanced 911 service capability that enables the automatic display of the ten-digit number used to place a 911 call from a wire line, wireless, interconnected VoIP or nontraditional telephone service.

“Caller identification information” means information provided by a caller identification service regarding the telephone number, or other origination information, of a call or facsimile transmission made using a telecommunications service or an interconnected VoIP service, or of a text message sent using a text-messaging service.

“Caller identification service” means any service or device designed to provide the user of the service or device with the telephone number of, or other information regarding the origination of, a call made using a telecommunications service or interconnected VoIP service. The term includes automatic number identification services.

“Interconnected VoIP service” means an interconnected Voice over Internet Protocol service that:

Enables real-time, two-way voice communications;

Requires a broadband internet connection from the user’s location;

Requires internet protocol-compatible customer premises equipment; and

Permits users generally to receive calls that originate on the public switched telephone network and to terminate calls to the public switched telephone network.

“Place of primary use” means the street address where a subscriber’s use of a telecommunications service or interconnected VoIP service primarily occurs, which shall be:

The residential street address or the primary business street address of the subscriber or, in the case of a subscriber of interconnected VoIP service, the subscriber’s registered location; and

Within the licensed service area of the provider.

“Provider” means a person or entity that offers telecommunications service or interconnected VoIP service.

“Registered location” means the most recent information obtained by an interconnected VoIP service provider that identifies the physical location of an end user.

“Subscriber” means a person:

Who subscribes to a caller identification service in connection with a telecommunications service or an interconnected VoIP service; and

Whose place of primary use for the service described in paragraph (h)(i) is located in Mississippi.

“Telecommunications service” means the offering of telecommunications for a fee directly to the public, or to classes of users so as to be effectively available directly to the public, regardless of the facilities used.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 326, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2010; Laws, 2019, ch. 487, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 77-3-805.
Causing caller identification service to transmit misleading or inaccurate caller identification information to subscriber prohibited.

Except as provided in Section 77-3-807, a person shall not, in connection with any telecommunications service or interconnected VOIP service, knowingly and with the intent to defraud or cause harm to another person or to wrongfully obtain anything of value, cause any caller identification service to transmit misleading or inaccurate caller identification information to a subscriber.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 326, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2010; Laws, 2019, ch. 487, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 77-3-807.
Exceptions.

This article does not apply to:

The blocking of caller identification information.

Any law enforcement agency of the federal, state, county or municipal government.

Any intelligence or security agency of the federal government.

A telecommunications, broadband or voice-over-Internet service provider that is acting solely as an intermediary for the transmission of telephone service between the caller and the recipient.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 326, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 77-3-809.
Penalties.

Any person who violates this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be subject to a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or shall be imprisoned in the county jail not exceeding one (1) year, or both.

Any violation of this article constitutes an unlawful trade practice under Section 75-24-5 and, in addition to any remedies or penalties set forth in this article, shall be subject to any remedies or penalties available for a violation of that statute.

Any violation of this article constitutes a violation of the Mississippi Telephone Solicitation Act, Section 77-3-701 et seq., and in addition to any remedies or penalties provided in this article, shall be subject to any remedies or penalties available for a violation of that act.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 326, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2010; Laws, 2019, ch. 487, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2019.